District of Columbia statutes.
7-1204.01

Court-ordered examinations.

Except as provided elsewhere by law, mental health information acquired by a mental health professional pursuant to a court-ordered examination may be disclosed in a manner provided by rules of court or by order of the court.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 401, 25 DCR 5055
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(f)(6), 48 DCR 7674
1981 Ed., § 6-2031.
1973 Ed., § 6-1628.
D.C. Law 14-56, inserted “or by order of the court.”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(f)(6) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(f)(6) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(f)(6) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).